Virginia statutes. Title 47.1. Notaries and Out-of-State Commissioners.
Chapter 6. Civil and Criminal Liability.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Notary Public, § 6.

§ 47.1-26.
Civil liability of notary.

A notary public shall be liable for all damages proximately caused by his official misconduct.

History.

Code 1950, § 47-3; 1972, c. 824; 1980, c. 580.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2011).

§ 47.1-27.
Civil liability of employer of notary.

The employer of a notary public shall also be liable for all damages proximately caused by the official misconduct by such notary if:

The notary public was acting within the scope of his employment at the time such damages were caused; and

The employer had actual knowledge of, or reasonably should have known of, such notary’s misconduct.

History.

1980, c. 580.

§ 47.1-28.
Willful misconduct a misdemeanor.

Any notary who knowingly and willfully commits any official misconduct under Chapter 5 (§

47.1-24

et seq.) of this title shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Any employer of a notary who willfully induces such notary to commit official misconduct under Chapter 5 of this title shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly and willfully misrepresents on an application for commission as a notary whether they have been convicted of any felony under the laws of this Commonwealth, of any other state, or of the United States shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1980, c. 580; 2008, cc. 117, 814.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 117 and 814 are identical and added subsection C.

§ 47.1-29.
Impersonation of notary a felony.

Any person who shall willfully act as, or otherwise impersonate, a notary public while not lawfully commissioned as a notary public or other official authorized to perform notarial acts, shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1980, c. 580.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 47.1-29.1.
Wrongful possession of software or hardware.

Any person who knowingly obtains, conceals, damages, or destroys the certificate, disk, coding, card, program, software, or hardware enabling an electronic notary to affix an official electronic signature or seal, without authority, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2007, cc. 269, 590.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

§ 47.1-30.
Conflict of interests.

No notary shall perform any notarial act with respect to any document, writing, or electronic document to which the notary or his spouse is a party, or in which either of them has a direct beneficial interest, or where the notary is a signatory or is named in the document to be notarized, except that a notary named in a document for the purpose of receiving notices, or named in a document as executor, trustee, or other fiduciary, shall not, for that reason alone, be precluded from performing notarial acts with respect to such document.

Any notary who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of official misconduct.

A notarial act performed in violation of this section shall not automatically be void for such reason, but shall be voidable in the discretion of any court of competent jurisdiction upon the motion of any person injured thereby.

History.

1980, c. 580; 1992, c. 194; 2007, cc. 269, 590; 2011, c. 746; 2012, c. 566.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 269 and 590, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this Act relating to electronic notaries public and electronic notarization shall become effective July 1, 2008.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590 are identical, and substituted “spouse is a party, or in which either of them has a direct” for “spouse shall be a party, or in which either of them shall have a direct” in the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 269 and 590, effective July 1, 2008, are identical, and inserted “or electronic document” near the middle of the first sentence, and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 746 added “or where the notary is a signatory or is named in the document to be notarized” at the end of the first sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 566 added the exception at the end of the first paragraph, and deleted the former second sentence thereof, which read: “A notary nominated as a fiduciary in a will shall not, for that reason alone, be deemed a party to the will or to have a direct beneficial interest therein.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).